Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-207
Cancel, defined.

Cancel shall mean to discontinue all rights and privileges to hold a license or permit for up to three years.

Laws 1983, LB 259, § 12;

Laws 1985, LB 408, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,1985, § 9-140.08;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 8;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 11.